test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pinge_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - пинге: # Ordinary nouns 'woman' - full paradigm including MWN
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: пинге
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+Indef: пингень
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+Indef: пингеда
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+Indef: пингенди
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+Indef: пингефтома
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: пингешка
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+Indef: пингеса
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+Indef: пингеста
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+Indef: пингес
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+Indef: пингева
     пинге+N+SP+Tra+Indef: пингекс
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: пингезе
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: пингене
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: пингезень
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: пингенень
     пинге+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [пингезенди, пингезти]
     пинге+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: пингененди
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: пингедон
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: пингефтомон
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: пингешкан
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: пингесон
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: пингестон
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: пингезон
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: пингеван
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: пингеце
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: пингетне
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: пингецень
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: пингетнень
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: пингедот
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: пингефтомот
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: пингешкат
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: пингесот
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: пингестот
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: пингезт
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: пингеват
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: пингец
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: пингенза
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: пингенц
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: пингензон
     пинге+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: пингенцты
     пинге+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: пингензонды
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: пингедонза
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: пингефтомонза
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: пингешканза
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: пингесонза
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: пингестонза
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: пингезонза
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: пингеванза
     пинге+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: пингеньке
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: пингеньконь
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: пингеньконди
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: пингедонк
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: пингефтомонк
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: пингешканк
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: пингесонк
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: пингестонк
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: пингезонк
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: пингеванк
     пинге+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: пингенте
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: пингентень
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: пингентенди
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: пингедонт
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: пингефтомонт
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: пингешкант
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: пингесонт
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: пингестонт
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: пингезонт
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: пингевант
     пинге+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: пингесна
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: пингеснон
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: пингеснонды
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: пингедост
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: пингефтомост
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: пингешкаст
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: пингесост
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: пингестост
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: пингезост
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: пингеваст
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: пингет
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+Def: пингесь
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+Def: пингеть
     пинге+N+Sg+Dat+Def: пингети
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+Def: пингетне
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+Def: пингетнень
     пинге+N+Pl+Dat+Def: пингетненди    
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: пингевок
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: пингеньвок
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: пингедовок
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: пингендивок
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: пингефтомовок
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Foc/вок: пингешкавок
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: пингесовок
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: пингестовок
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: пингесвок
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: пингевавок
     пинге+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: пингексвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингезевок
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингеневок
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингезеньвок
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингененьвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [пингезендивок, пингезтивок]
     пинге+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингенендивок
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингедонвок
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингефтомонвок
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингешканвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингесонвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингестонвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингезонвок
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пингеванвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингецевок
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингетневок
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингеценьвок
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингетненьвок
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингедотвок
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингефтомотвок
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингешкатвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингесотвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингестотвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингезтвок
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пингеватвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингецвок
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингензовок
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингенцвок
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингензонвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингенцтывок
     пинге+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингензондывок
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингедонзовок
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингефтомонзовок
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингешканзовок
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингесонзовок
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингестонзовок
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингезонзовок
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пингеванзовок
     пинге+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингенькевок
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингеньконьвок
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингенькондивок
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингедонквок
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингефтомонквок
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингешканквок
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингесонквок
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингестонквок
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингезонквок
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пингеванквок
     пинге+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингентевок
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингентеньвок
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингентендивок
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингедонтвок
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингефтомонтвок
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингешкантвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингесонтвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингестонтвок
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингезонтвок
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пингевантвок
     пинге+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингесновок
     пинге+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингеснонвок
     пинге+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингеснондывок
     пинге+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингедоствок
     пинге+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингефтомоствок
     пинге+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингешкаствок
     пинге+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингесоствок
     пинге+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингестоствок
     пинге+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингезоствок
     пинге+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пингеваствок
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: пингетвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: пингесьвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: пингетьвок
     пинге+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: пингетивок
     пинге+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: пингетневок
     пинге+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: пингетненьвок
     пинге+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: пингетнендивок
